California, session 20252026, SB584.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that all pupils, regardless of their background, must have a comprehensive understanding of democratic institutions in order to become active participants in their communities and their government.(b) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to create pathways for pupils in elementary and secondary schools to become civically engaged in democratic governmental institutions at the local, state, and national levels, and to provide civic learning resources and support for teachers to implement programming that will create these pathways.(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that social science instruction in elementary and secondary schools focus on the pupils’ understanding of the foundations of the democratic system in the United States of America, the roles of the three branches of government, and the State and Federal Constitutions, and include engagement with government agencies and policymakers at the local, state, and federal levels.SEC. 2.Section 51210 of the Education Code is amended to read:51210.(a)The adopted course of study for grades 1 to 6, inclusive, shall include instruction, beginning in grade 1 and continuing through grade 6, in the following areas of study:(1)English, including knowledge of, and appreciation for, literature and the language, as well as the skills of speaking, reading, listening, spelling, handwriting, including instruction in cursive or joined italics in the appropriate grade levels, and composition.(2)Mathematics, including concepts, operational skills, and problem solving.(3)Social sciences, drawing upon the disciplines of anthropology, economics, geography, history, political science, psychology, and sociology, designed to fit the maturity of the pupils. Instruction shall provide a foundation for understanding the history, resources, development, and government of California and the United States of America; the development of the American economic system, including the role of the entrepreneur and labor; the relations of persons to their human and natural environment; eastern and western cultures and civilizations; contemporary issues; the wise use of natural resources; and the Spanish colonization of California and the Gold Rush Era, including the treatment and perspectives of Native Americans during those periods. Instruction shall also include civic engagement experiences with governmental institutions.(4)Science, including the biological and physical aspects, with emphasis on the processes of experimental inquiry, on the place of humans in ecological systems, on the causes and effects of climate change, and on the methods to mitigate and adapt to climate change. Appropriate coursework including material on the causes and effects of climate change and methods to mitigate and adapt to climate change shall be offered to pupils as soon as possible, commencing no later than the 2024–25 school year.(5)Visual and performing arts, including instruction in the subjects of dance, music, theater, and visual arts, aimed at the development of aesthetic appreciation and the skills of creative expression.(6)Health, including instruction in the principles and practices of individual, family, and community health.(7)Physical education, with emphasis upon the physical activities for the pupils that may be conducive to health and vigor of body and mind, for a total period of time of not less than 200 minutes each 10 schooldays, excluding recesses and the lunch period, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 51222.(8)Other studies that the governing board may prescribe.(b)(1)A complaint that a school district or county superintendent of schools has not complied with the instructional minute requirements of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) may be filed with a school district or county superintendent of schools pursuant to the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(2)A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a school district or county superintendent of schools may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written appeal decision within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.(3)If a school district or county superintendent of schools finds merit in a complaint, or the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the school district or county superintendent of schools shall provide a remedy to all affected pupils, parents, and guardians.(c)The Legislature finds and declares that neither the original provisions of this section, nor any subsequent amendments to it, were intended to create a private right of action. However, nothing in this subdivision shall restrict or expand the existing right of any party to seek relief from noncompliance with this section pursuant to a writ of mandate.SEC. 3.Section 51220 of the Education Code is amended to read:51220.The adopted course of study for grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall offer courses in the following areas of study:(a)English, including knowledge of and appreciation for literature, language, and composition, and the skills of reading, listening, and speaking.(b)(1)Social sciences, drawing upon the disciplines of anthropology, economics, geography, history, political science, psychology, and sociology, designed to fit the maturity of the pupils. Instruction shall provide a foundation for understanding the history, resources, development, and government of California and the United States of America; instruction in our American legal system, the operation of the juvenile and adult criminal justice systems, and the rights and duties of citizens under the criminal and civil law and the State and Federal Constitutions; the development of the American economic system, including the role of the entrepreneur and labor; personal financial literacy; the relations of persons to their human and natural environment; eastern and western cultures and civilizations; human rights issues, with particular attention to the study of the inhumanity of genocide, slavery, and the Holocaust, and, to the extent instruction is provided on the Spanish colonization of California or the Gold Rush Era, the treatment and perspectives of Native Americans during those periods; and contemporary issues. Instruction shall also include civic engagement experiences with governmental institutions that are supportive of pupils earning the State Seal of Civic Engagement, as authorized by Section 51471.(2)For purposes of this subdivision, genocide may include the Armenian Genocide. The “Armenian Genocide” means the torture, starvation, and murder of 1,500,000 Armenians, which included death marches into the Syrian desert, by the rulers of the Ottoman Turkish Empire and the exile of more than 500,000 innocent people during the period from 1915 to 1923, inclusive.(c)World language or languages, beginning not later than grade 7, designed to develop a facility for understanding, speaking, reading, and writing the particular language.(d)Physical education, with emphasis given to physical activities that are conducive to health and to vigor of body and mind, as required by Section 51222.(e)Science, including the physical and biological aspects, with emphasis on basic concepts, theories, and processes of scientific investigation, on the place of humans in ecological systems, on the causes and effects of climate change, on the methods to mitigate and adapt to climate change, and with appropriate applications of the interrelation and interdependence of the sciences. Appropriate coursework including material on the causes and effects of climate change and methods to mitigate and adapt to climate change shall be offered to pupils as soon as possible, commencing no later than the 2024–25 school year.(f)Mathematics, including instruction designed to develop mathematical understandings, operational skills, and insight into problem solving procedures.(g)Visual and performing arts, including dance, music, theater, and visual arts, with emphasis upon development of aesthetic appreciation and the skills of creative expression.(h)Applied arts, including instruction in the areas of consumer education, family and consumer sciences education, industrial arts, general business education, or general agriculture.(i)Career technical education designed and conducted for the purpose of preparing youth for gainful employment in the occupations and in the numbers that are appropriate to the personnel needs of the state and the community served and relevant to the career desires and needs of the pupils.(j)Automobile driver education, designed to develop a knowledge of the Vehicle Code and other laws of this state relating to the operation of motor vehicles, a proper acceptance of personal responsibility in traffic, a true appreciation of the causes, seriousness, and consequences of traffic accidents, and the knowledge and attitudes necessary for the safe operation of motor vehicles. A course in automobile driver education shall include education in the safe operation of motorcycles.(k)Other studies that the governing board may prescribe.SEC. 2. Section 33540 of the Education Code is amended to read:33540. (a) The state board and the department shall request that the commission review and revise, as necessary, the course requirements in the history-social science framework developed by the History-Social Science Curriculum Framework and Criteria Committee of the state board to ensure that minimum standards for courses in American government and civics include sufficient attention to teaching pupils how to interact, in a practical manner, with state and local governmental agencies and representatives to solve problems and to petition for changes in laws and procedures, and that the course requirements in the history-social science framework are also included in all history and social science courses and all grade levels, as appropriate.(b) Whenever the history-social science framework is revised as required by law, the commission shall do, as appropriate and based on the subject matter of the course, all of the following:(1) Receive input from civics learning experts, including civics education program providers, associations of civics educators, and organizations dedicated to research on civics learning, for purposes of integrating civics learning content, concepts, and skills, at all appropriate grade levels, with the standards established by the state board in core curriculum areas, as specified in Section 60605, as that section read on June 30, 2011, and Section 60605.8.(2) Consider how civics and history instruction, at all appropriate grade levels, includes, in addition to the acquisition of content knowledge, the application of that content to develop the competence and skills needed for civic engagement. Instruction shall also include civic engagement experiences with governmental institutions that are supportive of pupils earning the State Seal of Civic Engagement as authorized by Section 51471.(3) Ensure that voter education information is included in the American government and civics curriculum at the high school level, including, but not limited to, information on the importance of registering to vote in local, state, and federal elections, how to register to vote, both online and by mail, what the requirements are to register to vote, how to request an absentee ballot, how to fill out and return an absentee ballot, what to expect on election day, how to find a polling place, and where and how to access and understand the voter information pamphlet and other materials to become an informed voter.(4) Ensure the following historical documents are incorporated into the framework:(A) The Declaration of Independence.(B) The United States Constitution, including the Bill of Rights.(C) The Federalist Papers.(D) The Emancipation Proclamation.(E) The Gettysburg Address.(F) George Washington’s Farewell Address.(5) Consider incorporating the following historical documents into the framework:(A) The Magna Carta.(B) The Articles of Confederation.(C) The California Constitution.(6) Encourage instruction that promotes an understanding of the governments of California and the United States of America, including, but not limited to, the development of democracy and the history of the development of the United States Constitution.(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, for purposes of the history-social science framework that is revised any time after January 1, 2015, that the commission consider whether and how to incorporate the College, Career, and Civic Life (C3) Framework for Social Studies State Standards into that framework.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature, for purposes of only the history-social science framework that is revised after January 1, 2015, that the requirements imposed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) may be satisfied under the framework adoption procedures currently being used by the department as of January 1, 2015.(e) When the history-social science content standards are next revised after January 1, 2015, the state board shall consider incorporating the College, Career, and Civic Life (C3) Framework for Social Studies State Standards into the history-social science content standards.SEC. 4.SEC. 3. Section 51475 of the Education Code is amended to read:51475. (a) The California Serves Program is hereby established under the administration of the department, in collaboration with CaliforniaVolunteers, for purposes of promoting access to effective service learning for pupils in grades 1 to 12, inclusive, who are enrolled at participating local educational agencies, with the goal of expanding access for high school graduates in obtaining a State Seal of Civic Engagement through service learning.(b) The department, in partnership with CaliforniaVolunteers, shall do all of the following:(1) Review the available evidence on ways to incorporate effective service learning for pupils in grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and, on or before January 1, 2027, provide recommendations to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code and consistent with the recommended criteria and implementation guidance for the State Seal of Civic Engagement pursuant to this article, on evidence-based strategies to expand access to high-quality service learning programs in local educational agencies serving grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and promote equitable access to these programs.(2) On or before January 1, 2027, develop and post on the department’s and CaliforniaVolunteers’ internet websites evidence-based strategies for expanding access to high-quality service learning programs that may be used by teachers and local educational agencies for grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(3) Develop model uniform metrics, based on the recommended criteria for the State Seal of Civic Engagement, for the measurement of pupil progress for grades 1 to 12, inclusive, toward academic, civic engagement, and other learning objectives. Civic learning objectives shall include the final goal of awarding of the State Seal of Civic Engagement pursuant to this article.(4) Use the evidence, recommendations, and metrics identified pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, in the administration of the California Serves Program.(c) (1) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated, each fiscal year, from the General Fund to the department for annual awards to local educational agencies for California Serves Program grants pursuant to this section.(2) The department, in collaboration with CaliforniaVolunteers, shall establish the California Serves Program grant program, develop criteria for the awarding of grants and an application process, request necessary data from participating local educational agencies, and award grants consistent with this section.(d) In order for a local educational agency to be eligible for a grant under this section, at least 55 percent of the pupils enrolled in the applicant local educational agency shall be unduplicated pupils as defined in Section 2574 or 42238.02, as applicable.(e) Eligible local educational agencies who receive grants pursuant to this grant program shall receive an amount of up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) annually.(f) Allowable uses for funding allocated pursuant to this grant program include all of the following:(1) Paid planning time for teachers to increase the use of service learning in their instruction.(2) Professional development for school and local educational agency administrators and classroom teachers on service learning.(3) Purchase of instructional materials to aid in the use of service learning in instruction.(4) Participation costs of pupils and school personnel, including any materials or travel expenses related to service learning activities.(5) Personnel costs for coordination of service learning at a local educational agency or a schoolsite of a local educational agency.(6) Participation costs associated with grant program evaluation.(g) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before November 5, 2024, and annually thereafter, the department, in partnership with CaliforniaVolunteers, shall submit a report on the program to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code. The report shall include an evaluation of the program using the model uniform metrics established by the department in partnership with CaliforniaVolunteers pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:(1) The number of participating pupils by grade, schools, and local educational agencies, and the grant awards for each grantee.(2) The demographics of pupils engaged in service learning as a result of the grant.(3) The impact of the service performed by pupils and school staff as a result of the grant.(4) Pupil outcomes in the academic, civic engagement, and other learning objectives measured by the model uniform metrics identified by the department in partnership with CaliforniaVolunteers pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), including, but not limited to, obtaining the State Seal of Civic Engagement.(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “CaliforniaVolunteers” means CaliforniaVolunteers as established by Executive Order No. S-24-06.(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(3)  “Program” means the California Serves Program established pursuant to subdivision (a).(4) “Service learning” means an educational approach that intentionally combines meaningful community service activities with instruction and reflection to support pupil progress toward academic and civic engagement learning objectives while meeting societal needs.(i) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (c) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the appropriation is made, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the appropriation is made.SEC. 5.SEC. 4. Section 51476 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 51475, to read:51476. (a) School districts, county offices of education, and charter schools shall do both of the following:(1) Implement a Civic Engagement Pathway Program for pupils in grades 1 to 8, inclusive, to increase pupil awareness and civic engagement in democratic governmental institutions at the local, state, and national levels.(2) Provide civic learning resources and support for teachers to implement programming described in paragraph (1).(b) A Civic Engagement Pathway Program shall provide opportunities for pupils to engage in civic engagement experience with governmental institutions that are supportive of pupils earning the State Seal of Civic Engagement as authorized by Section 51471.(c) School districts, county offices of education, and charter schools are encouraged to establish local recognition programs to recognize pupils participating in Civic Engagement Pathway Programs based on locally developed criteria.SEC. 6.SEC. 5.  If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.